Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Intake

§ 43-21-351.
Reception of information.

Any person or agency having knowledge that a child residing or being within the county is within the jurisdiction of the youth court may make a written report to the intake unit alleging facts sufficient to establish the jurisdiction of the youth court. The report shall bear a permanent number that will be assigned by the court in accordance with the standards established by the Administrative Office of Courts pursuant to Section 9-21-9(d), and shall be preserved until destroyed on order of the court.

There shall be in each youth court of the state an intake officer who shall be responsible for the accurate and timely entering of all intake and case information into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) for the Division of Youth Services, truancy matters and the Division of Family and Children’s Services. It shall be the responsibility of the youth court judge or referee of each county to ensure that the intake officer is carrying out the responsibility of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 40; Laws, 1998, ch. 367, § 4; Laws, 2015, ch. 418, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-21-353.
Duty to inform state agencies and officials; duty to inform individual about whom report has been made of specific allegations.

Any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, public or private school employee or any other person having reasonable cause to suspect that a child is a neglected child, an abused child, or a victim of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking shall cause an oral report to be made immediately by telephone or otherwise and followed as soon thereafter as possible by a report in writing to the Department of Child Protection Services, and immediately a referral shall be made by the Department of Child Protection Services to the youth court intake unit, which unit shall promptly comply with Section 43-21-357. In the course of an investigation, at the initial time of contact with the individual(s) about whom a report has been made under this Youth Court Act or with the individual(s) responsible for the health or welfare of a child about whom a report has been made under this chapter, the Department of Child Protection Services shall inform the individual of the specific complaints or allegations made against the individual. Consistent with subsection (4), the identity of the person who reported his or her suspicion shall not be disclosed at that point. Where appropriate, the Department of Child Protection Services shall additionally make a referral to the youth court prosecutor.

Upon receiving a report that a child has been sexually abused, is a victim of commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking or has been burned, tortured, mutilated or otherwise physically abused in such a manner as to cause serious bodily harm, or upon receiving any report of abuse that would be a felony under state or federal law, the Department of Child Protection Services shall immediately notify the law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the abuse occurred. Within forty-eight (48) hours, the department must notify the appropriate prosecutor and the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator. The department shall have the duty to provide the law enforcement agency all the names and facts known at the time of the report; this duty shall be of a continuing nature. The law enforcement agency and the department shall investigate the reported abuse immediately and shall file a preliminary report with the appropriate prosecutor’s office within twenty-four (24) hours and shall make additional reports as new or additional information or evidence becomes available. The department shall advise the clerk of the youth court and the youth court prosecutor of all cases of abuse reported to the department within seventy-two (72) hours and shall update such report as information becomes available. In addition, if the Department of Child Protection Services determines that a parent or other person responsible for the care or welfare of an abused or neglected child maintains active duty status within the military, the department shall notify the applicable military installation family advocacy program that there is an allegation of abuse or neglect that relates to that child.

Any report shall contain the names and addresses of the child and his parents or other persons responsible for his care, if known, the child’s age, the nature and extent of the child’s injuries, including any evidence of previous injuries, any other information that might be helpful in establishing the cause of the injury, and the identity of the perpetrator.

The Department of Child Protection Services shall maintain a statewide incoming wide-area telephone service or similar service for the purpose of receiving reports of suspected cases of child abuse, commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking; provided that any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer or public or private school employee who is required to report under subsection (1) of this section shall report in the manner required in subsection (1).

Reports of abuse, neglect and commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking made under this chapter and the identity of the reporter are confidential except when the court in which the investigation report is filed, in its discretion, determines the testimony of the person reporting to be material to a judicial proceeding or when the identity of the reporter is released to law enforcement agencies and the appropriate prosecutor pursuant to subsection (1). Reports made under this section to any law enforcement agency or prosecutorial officer are for the purpose of criminal investigation and prosecution only and no information from these reports may be released to the public except as provided by Section 43-21-261. Disclosure of any information by the prosecutor shall be according to the Mississippi Uniform Rules of Circuit and County Court Procedure. The identity of the reporting party shall not be disclosed to anyone other than law enforcement officers or prosecutors without an order from the appropriate youth court. Any person disclosing any reports made under this section in a manner not expressly provided for in this section or Section 43-21-261 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalties prescribed by Section 43-21-267. Notwithstanding the confidentiality of the reporter’s identity under this section, the Department of Child Protection Services may disclose a reporter’s identity to the appropriate law enforcement agency or prosecutor if the department has reason to suspect the reporter has made a fraudulent report, and the Department of Child Protection Services must provide to the subject of the alleged fraudulent report written notification of the disclosure.

All final dispositions of law enforcement investigations described in subsection (1) of this section shall be determined only by the appropriate prosecutor or court. All final dispositions of investigations by the Department of Child Protection Services as described in subsection (1) of this section shall be determined only by the youth court. Reports made under subsection (1) of this section by the Department of Child Protection Services to the law enforcement agency and to the district attorney’s office shall include the following, if known to the department:

The name and address of the child;

The names and addresses of the parents;

The name and address of the suspected perpetrator;

The names and addresses of all witnesses, including the reporting party if a material witness to the abuse;

A brief statement of the facts indicating that the child has been abused, including whether the child experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking, and any other information from the agency files or known to the family protection worker or family protection specialist making the investigation, including medical records or other records, which may assist law enforcement or the district attorney in investigating and/or prosecuting the case; and

What, if any, action is being taken by the Department of Child Protection Services.

In any investigation of a report made under this chapter of the abuse or neglect of a child as defined in Section 43-21-105(l) or (m), the Department of Child Protection Services may request the appropriate law enforcement officer with jurisdiction to accompany the department in its investigation, and in such cases the law enforcement officer shall comply with such request.

Anyone who willfully violates any provision of this section shall be, upon being found guilty, punished by a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by imprisonment in jail not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

If a report is made directly to the Department of Child Protection Services that a child has been abused or neglected or experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking in an out-of-home setting, a referral shall be made immediately to the law enforcement agency in whose jurisdiction the abuse occurred and the department shall notify the district attorney’s office and the Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator within forty-eight (48) hours of such report. The Department of Child Protection Services shall investigate the out-of-home setting report of abuse or neglect to determine whether the child who is the subject of the report, or other children in the same environment, comes within the jurisdiction of the youth court and shall report to the youth court the department’s findings and recommendation as to whether the child who is the subject of the report or other children in the same environment require the protection of the youth court. The law enforcement agency shall investigate the reported abuse immediately and shall file a preliminary report with the district attorney’s office within forty-eight (48) hours and shall make additional reports as new information or evidence becomes available. If the out-of-home setting is a licensed facility, an additional referral shall be made by the Department of Child Protection Services to the licensing agency. The licensing agency shall investigate the report and shall provide the Department of Child Protection Services, the law enforcement agency and the district attorney’s office with their written findings from such investigation as well as that licensing agency’s recommendations and actions taken.

If a child protective investigation does not result in an out-of-home placement, a child protective investigator must provide information to the parent or guardians about community service programs that provide respite care, counseling and support for children who have experienced commercial sexual exploitation or human trafficking, voluntary guardianship or other support services for families in crisis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 41; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 17; Laws, 1984, ch. 342; Laws, 1985, ch. 360; Laws, 1993, ch. 522, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 387, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 591, § 3; Laws, 1995, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 323, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 10; Laws, 1998, ch. 340, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 557, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 489, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 337, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 501, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2019, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 420, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2019; Laws, 2019, ch. 473, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-354.
Statewide incoming wide area telephone service to be maintained on twenty-four-hour seven days a week basis.

The statewide incoming wide area telephone service established pursuant to Section 43-21-353, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be maintained by the Department of Public Welfare, or its successor, on a twenty-four-hour seven (7) days a week basis.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 566, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 1989).

§ 43-21-355.
Immunity for reporting information.

Any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, school attendance officer, public school district employee, nonpublic school employee, licensed professional counselor or any other person participating in the making of a required report pursuant to Section 43-21-353 or participating in the judicial proceeding resulting therefrom shall be presumed to be acting in good faith. Any person or institution reporting in good faith shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 42; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 18; Laws, 1982, Ex Sess, ch. 17, § 22; Laws, 1993, ch. 522, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 591, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 489, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 430, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 600, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 43-21-357.
Intake procedure.

After receiving a report, the youth court intake unit shall promptly make a preliminary inquiry to determine whether the interest of the child, other children in the same environment or the public requires the youth court to take further action. As part of the preliminary inquiry, the youth court intake unit may request or the youth court may order the Department of Human Services, the Department of Youth Services, any successor agency or any other qualified public employee to make an investigation or report concerning the child and any other children in the same environment, and present the findings thereof to the youth court intake unit. If the youth court intake unit receives a neglect or abuse report, the youth court intake unit shall immediately forward the complaint to the Department of Human Services to promptly make an investigation or report concerning the child and any other children in the same environment and promptly present the findings thereof to the youth court intake unit. If it appears from the preliminary inquiry that the child or other children in the same environment are within the jurisdiction of the court, the youth court intake unit shall recommend to the youth court:

That the youth court take no action;

That an informal adjustment be made;

The Department of Human Services, Division of Family and Children Services, monitor the child, family and other children in the same environment;

That the child is warned or counseled informally;

That the child be referred to the youth court intervention court; or

That a petition be filed.

The youth court shall then, without a hearing:

Order that no action be taken;

Order that an informal adjustment be made;

Order that the Department of Human Services, Division of Family and Children Services, monitor the child, family and other children in the same environment;

Order that the child is warned or counseled informally;

That the child be referred to the youth intervention court; or

Order that a petition be filed.

If the preliminary inquiry discloses that a child needs emergency medical treatment, the judge may order the necessary treatment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 43; Laws, 1986, ch. 416, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 440, § 11; Laws, 1998, ch. 367, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2012.); Laws, 2019, ch. 466, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2019.